apertium-pl-dsb.dsb.metadix
    <pardef n="/źeń__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dnja</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dnju</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>źeń</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dnju</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dnjom</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>źeń</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dnjowu</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dnjoma</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dnja</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dnjoma</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dnjoma</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dnja</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dnjow</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dnjam</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dny</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dnjach</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dnjami</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dny</l>
          <r>źeń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="źeń"><i></i><par n="/źeń__n"/></e>
